Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.170

False or misleading entries or statements, refusal to produce records.

Whoever, in any application for a license or in any book or record required to be maintained by the commission or in any report required to be submitted to the commission, shall make any false or misleading statement, or make any false or misleading entry or wilfully fail to maintain or make any entry required to be maintained or made, or who wilfully refuses to produce for inspection by the commission, or its designee, any book, record, or document required to be maintained or made by federal or state law, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 1991 c 261 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 17.]